Hawaii statutes.
§468E-16 Penalties. Any person who
violates any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated
thereunder shall be guilty of a petty misdemeanor, the fine for which shall be
not more than $1,000. [L 1974, c 48, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 24, §11]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next